Utah statutes.
58-44a-305.   Intern license.

(1)  The division may issue an intern license to an individual who meets all qualifications for licensure except the passing of the qualifying examination if the applicant:

(a)  graduated from an approved education program within the 12 months immediately preceding the application for licensure;

(b)  has never before taken the qualifying examination;

(c)  is registered to take the next qualifying examination; and

(d)  presents a plan acceptable to the division and board under which the applicant will practice under any intern license issued only under the direct supervision of a nurse midwife or physician.

(2) An intern license issued under this section expires on:

(a)  the date of the next qualifying examination immediately following issuance of the intern license if the intern license holder does not sit for that examination;

(b)  the date the examination results are available if the intern license holder sits for the next succeeding qualifying examination and fails the examination; or

(c)  the date on which a regular license is issued if the intern license holder passes the examination and is otherwise qualified for licensure.



Amended by Chapter 288, 1998 General Session

